District of Columbia statutes.
9-421.12

Assessment when roadway paved — Severability.

Should any provision of this subchapter be decided by the courts to be unconstitutional or invalid, the validity of §§ 9-421.01 to 9-421.12 as a whole or of any part thereof other than the part decided to be unconstitutional shall not be affected.

Feb. 20, 1931, 46 Stat. 1199, ch. 246, § 12
1981 Ed., § 7-638.
1973 Ed., § 7-633.